Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4318.01
Manufacturer, distributor, retailer; defined.

(1) Manufacturer shall mean a person who quarries, crushes, or grinds agricultural liming materials.

(2) Distributor shall mean one who sells agricultural liming material to any but the ultimate consumer.

(3) Retailer shall mean one who sells agricultural liming material to the ultimate consumer.

(4) Any person can be either a manufacturer, distributor, or seller, or any combination thereof, depending upon the function performed by such person in any given transaction.

Laws 1983, LB 539, § 4.